Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
REVIEW

16-12-101. Review of proceedings resulting in conviction.

Every person convicted of an offense under the statutes of this state has the right of appeal to review the proceedings resulting in conviction. The procedures to be followed in any such appeal shall be as provided by applicable rule of the supreme court of Colorado.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 253, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-12-101.

16-12-101.5. Review of proceedings regarding class 1 felony convictions - legislative intent.

The general assembly urges the Colorado supreme court to adopt an expedited process to review class 1 felony convictions where the death penalty has been imposed and any order by the district court granting or denying postconviction relief in such cases. It is the general assembly's intent that the Colorado supreme court give priority to cases in which a sentence of death has been imposed over other cases before the court, except to the extent of any conflict with the requirement that the court give the highest priority to enforcement actions brought in accordance with section 20 (1) of article X of the state constitution.

In any direct appeal of any class 1 felony case in which a conviction is entered and in which a sentence of death is imposed prior to the date upon which the Colorado supreme court adopts rules implementing the unitary system of review established by part 2 of this article, all challenges to any such conviction or sentence, with the exception of any newly discovered evidence or any claim of ineffective assistance of counsel, shall be included in the brief of the person challenging such conviction or sentence, as such brief is defined by rule 28 of the Colorado appellate rules, at the time such brief is filed with the supreme court of the state of Colorado. Any issue which is not raised in the manner prescribed in this section shall be deemed to be irrevocably waived by the person challenging such conviction or sentence. The failure of such person to file a brief within any time limits ordered by the supreme court of the state of Colorado shall constitute an irrevocable waiver of all issues which could have been raised in such brief.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 430, § 7, effective May 24.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1473, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1582, § 4, effective June 4.

16-12-102. Appeals by the prosecution.

The prosecution may appeal any decision of a court in a criminal case upon any question of law. Any order of a court that either dismisses one or more counts of a charging document prior to trial or grants a new trial after the entry of a verdict or judgment shall constitute a final order that shall be immediately appealable pursuant to this subsection (1). If any act of the general assembly is adjudged inoperative or unconstitutional in any criminal case, it is the duty of the district attorney of the judicial district in which the court making such decision is situated to appeal on behalf of the people of the state of Colorado, unless the same issue of constitutionality is already pending before a reviewing court in another case. Nothing in this section shall authorize placing the defendant in jeopardy a second time for the same offense. No docket fee shall be required of the people upon an appeal under this section. The procedure to be followed in filing and prosecuting appeals under this section shall be as provided by applicable rule of the supreme court of Colorado. However, if a statute providing for the imposition of the death penalty is adjudged inoperative or inapplicable for any reason, such adjudication shall constitute a final order that shall be immediately appealable to the supreme court of Colorado, notwithstanding any statute or court rule to the contrary.

The prosecution may file an interlocutory appeal in the supreme court from a ruling of the trial court granting a motion made in advance of trial by the defendant for the return of property and to suppress evidence or granting a motion to suppress an extrajudicial confession or admission if the prosecution certifies to the judge who granted such motion and to the supreme court that the appeal is not taken for the purposes of delay and the evidence is a substantial part of the proof of the charge pending against the defendant. The prosecution may also file an interlocutory appeal in the supreme court from a ruling of the trial court granting a motion in limine pertaining to the matters described in this subsection (2), or from a ruling on a motion made pursuant to section 18-1-202 (11), C.R.S., challenging the place of trial or from a ruling on a motion to disqualify a district attorney pursuant to section 20-1-107, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 253, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-12-102.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 734, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 863, § 4, effective April 12.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended, p. 15, § 1, effective October 7.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 400, § 8, effective June 3.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1728, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 948, § 9, effective May 27.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 453, § 9, effective April 24.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 759, § 5, effective July 1.

16-12-103. Stays of execution.

When a person has been convicted of an offense and a notice of appeal is filed, he shall be entitled to a stay of execution by compliance with the provisions and requirements of the applicable rules of the supreme court of Colorado.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 253, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-12-103.

Cross references:

For stay of execution in criminal appeals from county courts, see Crim. P. 37(f); for stay of execution in criminal appeals from district courts, see C.A.R. 8.1.